North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-11 State University and School of Mines

15-11-01.
State university — Where located.

The state university of North Dakota established and located at the city of Grand Forks shall be the university of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1883 Sp., ch. 40, § 1; N.D. Const., § 215; R.C. 1895, § 875; R.C. 1899, § 875; R.C. 1905, § 1040; C.L. 1913, § 1539; R.C. 1943, § 15-1101.

Cross-References.

Control and administration of university by state board of higher education, see N.D.C.C. § 15-10-01.

Establishment and location of university, see N.D. Const., art. IX, § 12.

Patenting inventions by faculty, officials and employees, see N.D.C.C. ch. 47-28.

15-11-02.
Colleges may be united with university. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-02.1.
Supervision of the junior college located at Devils Lake. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 439, § 12.

15-11-03.
Powers of president and faculty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-11-04.
Objects and departments of the university. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

15-11-05.
Courses of instruction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-06.
Scandinavian language to be taught. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

15-11-07.
Persons eligible as students. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-08.
Geological and natural history survey — Duty of board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-11-09.
State geologist — Appointment of deputy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-11-10.
Salary of state geologist and deputy state geologist. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 128, § 1.

15-11-11.
Geological survey — Extent — Analysis. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-11-11.1.
Authority of the state geologist — Acquisition of geophysical data — Confidentiality. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-11-12.
Geological map of the state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-11-13.
Specimens collected — Exhibited — Exchanged. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-11-14.
Biennial report by state board of higher education on surveys. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-11-15.
Tests of state mineral and other resources — Duty of state board of higher education — Bulletins published.

The state board of higher education shall provide at the university of North Dakota suitable means for experimentation and practical testing of the mineral and other allied resources of the state in order to demonstrate their fitness for mining and manufacturing industries.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 236, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1573; R.C. 1943, § 15-1115; S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 2.

15-11-16.
Discoveries at school of mines and substations to be patented and assigned. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 296, § 5.

15-11-17.
Penalty for failure to patent discovery or to transfer patent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 296, § 5.

15-11-18.
Assignment of patent or permitting use thereof. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 296, § 5.

15-11-19.
Library of law college — Supervision. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-11-20.
Annual inventory of law library. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 200, § 1.

15-11-21.
Board of higher education to furnish supreme court reports to law school. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-22.
State university alumni building — Construction on campus — Power of state board of higher education.

The alumni association of the university of North Dakota, a corporation, with the advice and consent of the state board of higher education, may select a space and plat of ground upon the campus of the university, not exceeding three hundred feet [91.44 meters] in length and one hundred fifty feet [45.72 meters] in width, for the purpose of erecting and maintaining thereon an alumni building by the alumni association, to cost not less than seventy-five thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 114, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1577b1; R.C. 1943, § 15-1122.

15-11-23.
Alumni building — Application for site — Duty of state board of higher education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-24.
Alumni building — Authority as to building on campus — Rules and regulations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-25.
Alumni building — Contract for heat and light. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-26.
Alumni building — Title to site — Title to building.

The title to the ground selected by the alumni association for an alumni building must remain forever in the state, subject to the purposes specified. The title to the alumni building must remain in the alumni association until it may be relinquished or granted formally to the state.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 114, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 1577b5; R.C. 1943, § 15-1126; S.L. 1971, ch. 167, § 1.

15-11-27.
Transfer of license of university radio station authorized. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-11-28.
Hockey admission receipts may be pledged for purchase of artificial ice equipment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-11-29.
Matching funds for bequests to university of North Dakota.

In any case wherein any person, corporation, or limited liability company shall have made any gift to the university of North Dakota, whether by donation, bequest, devise, or otherwise, upon condition that the university of North Dakota must raise a matching, equivalent, or counterpart fund held to the same purposes as the original gift in order to enjoy such gift, the university of North Dakota alumni association, incorporated, is hereby empowered to raise such equivalent, matching, or counterpart fund by any practicable and lawful means, and to hold such equivalent, matching, or counterpart fund so raised in trust for the same purposes as the original gift; and such equivalent, matching, or counterpart fund shall be deemed both in law and equity to have been raised by the university of North Dakota. For this purpose the university of North Dakota alumni association, incorporated, is hereby declared to be an agent of the university of North Dakota. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the university of North Dakota alumni association, incorporated, any power or authority to alter or change the provisions of any instrument of trust or agreement wherein it is named custodian or trustee of any funds or securities or given any legal power with respect thereto, and nothing in this section shall be deemed to permit the university of North Dakota alumni association, incorporated, to enlarge, amend, or derogate from any conditions such instrument of trust or agreement imposes, or to devote any trust funds in its possession to any purpose other than those stipulated by the settlers of such trust.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 124, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 15-1129; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

15-11-30.
Sale of university land to fraternal societies.

The state board of higher education is hereby authorized to plat and replat, and after such platting, to sell and convey tracts of land lying within the east thirty-one acres [12.55 hectares] of the north half of the southwest quarter of section five in township one hundred fifty-one north, range fifty west of the fifth meridian, in Grand Forks County, North Dakota, of such size as may in the judgment of said board be for the best interests of the university, at such prices as may be determined by said board to be adequate and proper in the light of the cost thereof and of the improvements provided, to fraternities, sororities, and institutional dormitory corporations for use solely and only as sites for fraternity houses, sorority houses, dormitories, and like buildings, for the housing of students and faculty of the university of North Dakota.

All such deeds of conveyance must contain a provision for the reversion of the title thereto to the state of North Dakota should said premises ever be used for purposes other than those above provided.

Conveyances of said property must be executed in the name of the state of North Dakota by the governor and attested by the secretary of state, under the great seal of the state of North Dakota, upon resolution duly adopted by the state board of higher education and filed with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 125, §§ 1 to 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 15-1130.

Collateral References.

Regulation as to fraternities and similar associations connected with educational institutions, 10 A.L.R.3d 389.

15-11-31.
Assembly hall on university campus. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-11-32.
Child welfare research bureau — Establishment — Director.

A child welfare research bureau is hereby established. The bureau must be administered and funded by and in conjunction with the university of North Dakota. The university shall appoint a director.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 205, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 3.

15-11-33.
Functions.

The purpose of the child welfare research bureau is to conduct applied research on matters pertaining to the welfare of children and youth in this state. The bureau may render services consistent with its purpose, including:

Compilation, analysis, publication, and dissemination of statistics, summaries, and other information relating to research conducted on matters pertaining to the welfare of children and youth.

Technical assistance to public and nonprofit private agencies and organizations to assist them in planning, improving, developing, and carrying out programs and activities that serve children and youth.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 205, § 2.

15-11-34.
Gifts and grants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-11-35.
Fetal alcohol syndrome center established.

There is established at the university of North Dakota school of medicine a fetal alcohol syndrome center.

The state board of higher education shall appoint a director of the fetal alcohol syndrome program. The director shall prepare an annual report on the status of fetal alcohol syndrome in North Dakota.

The fetal alcohol syndrome center shall develop prevention activities in groups that are at high risk for fetal alcohol syndrome. The center may enlist the aid of other agencies, persons, or organizations in its activities.

The responsibilities of the fetal alcohol syndrome program include:

Developing incidence and prevalence data on fetal alcohol syndrome in this state.

Conducting research on prevention and management of fetal alcohol syndrome and maternal alcohol ingestion during pregnancy.

Developing a center for the evaluation of children with fetal alcohol syndrome from this state in cooperation with the child evaluation and treatment program at the university of North Dakota medical center and operating followup clinics as funding allows.

Providing consultation and training across the state on fetal alcohol syndrome.

Conducting other activities as may be directed by a state fetal alcohol syndrome task force.

The fetal alcohol syndrome center shall coordinate a study of the prevalence of fetal alcohol syndrome in school-age children in this state. The study must review the prevalence of fetal alcohol syndrome in both rural and urban North Dakota communities, including North Dakota Indian reservations.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 167, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 162, § 4.

15-11-36.
Evaluation of children with fetal alcohol syndrome.

The child evaluation and treatment program at the university of North Dakota medical center shall develop a clinic to provide both initial diagnostic assessment and re-evaluation of children with fetal alcohol syndrome. The diagnostic assessment must include a comprehensive multidisciplinary assessment of psychological, speech and language, educational, occupational therapy, physical therapy, optometric, and audiological evaluations. Re-evaluations must be individualized according to a child’s needs. The center shall provide consultative services to schools, community agencies, and parents to assist in serving children diagnosed with fetal alcohol syndrome.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 167, § 3; 2001, ch. 162, § 5.

15-11-37.
Acceptance of gifts by dean of medical school.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the dean of the university of North Dakota medical school may accept and receive gifts, grants, bequests, and donations that are hereby appropriated for use by the university of North Dakota medical school.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 19.

15-11-38.
Ralph Engelstad arena.

The hockey arena constructed on the campus of the university of North Dakota with funds donated by Ralph and Betty Engelstad is officially named the Ralph Engelstad arena.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 135, § 1.

15-11-39.
Nursing education consortium — Continuing appropriation.

The university of North Dakota college of nursing shall establish and administer a nursing education consortium for the purpose of addressing common concerns in nursing education which produce obstacles in meeting the state’s current and future nursing needs, with a focus on the specific needs of rural communities.

The consortium membership must include representation of the university of North Dakota college of nursing, the university of North Dakota center for rural health, and the board of nursing. In addition, each nursing program in this state which is approved by the board of nursing and each nursing program with approval pending which is located in this state must be invited to have representation in the consortium. The consortium members may invite interested persons to join the consortium membership or to participate in consortium activities. Interested persons may include the North Dakota nurses association nursing practice council leadership team; North Dakota hospital association; workforce partners, including job service North Dakota, the department of commerce division of workforce development, rural leadership of North Dakota, and the North Dakota workforce development council; employer partners; and other interested public and private parties. The consortium members shall select the chairman.

The consortium shall advise university of North Dakota officials regarding strategies to address common concerns in nursing education which produce obstacles in meeting the state’s current and future nursing needs, specific needs of rural communities, and development of a strategic plan for the ongoing activities of the simulation laboratory initiative, including goals and benchmarks for the implementation of the simulation laboratory initiative.

The consortium may contract with a third party in conducting the duties of the consortium and may seek, receive, and accept from any source aid or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of the consortium. Any money received by the consortium as gifts, grants, or donations is appropriated as a continuing appropriation for the purpose of funding the simulation laboratory program and the activities of the consortium.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 155, § 1; 2009, ch. 159, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 7.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 155, S.L. 2007 provides: “

STATE BOARD OF HIGHER EDUCATION—LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the state board of higher education establish and implement a policy and procedure for institutions of higher education under the control of the board to participate in systemwide initiatives.”

Section 4 of chapter 155, S.L. 2007 provides: “

COMPETITIVE GRANT ELIGIBILITY—LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the nursing education consortium apply for public and private grants to assist in financing section 1 of this act and that state agencies interpret grant application guidelines broadly to allow the nursing education consortium to be eligible to apply for grants.”

15-11-40.
State energy research center — Report.
[Expires June 30, 2027]

The state energy research center at the university of North Dakota energy and environmental research center is created for the purpose of conducting exploratory, transformational, and innovative research that advances future energy opportunities and benefits the state’s economy and environment through:

Exploratory research of technologies and methodologies that facilitate the prudent development, and clean and efficient use, of the state’s energy resources;

Greater access to energy experts for timely scientific and engineering studies to support the state’s interests; and

Education and outreach related to the state’s energy resources.

The state energy research center shall report all research activities and accomplishments annually to the interim legislative energy development and transmission committee and to the industrial commission. Upon request, the state energy research center shall report all research activities and accomplishments to the appropriations committees of the legislative assembly.

To effectuate the purposes of this section, the energy and environmental research center may:

Select the research topics and projects to be pursued;

Enter contracts or agreements with other North Dakota institutions of higher education to support select research topics and projects;

Enter contracts or agreements with federal, private, and nonprofit organizations to carry out selected research topics and projects; and

Accepting donations, grants, contributions, and gifts from any source to carry out the selected research topics and projects.

The state energy research center may not conduct research or pursue projects that will result in the exploration, storage, treatment, or disposal of high-level radioactive waste in North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 42, § 21, eff July 1, 2021; Expired by 2019, ch. 139, § 3, as amended by 2021 ch. 42, § 21, eff June 30, 2027.